Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.500

Crime information center—Established—Purpose—Functions.

There is established the Washington state crime information center to be located in the records division of the Washington state patrol and to function under the direction of the chief of the Washington state patrol. The center shall serve to coordinate crime information, by means of data processing, for all law enforcement agencies in the state. It shall make such use of the facilities of the law enforcement teletype system as is practical. It shall provide access to the national crime information center, to motor vehicle and driver license information, to the sex offender central registry, and to such other public records as may be accessed by data processing and which are pertinent to law enforcement.

[ 1998 c 67 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 27 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 67: "This act takes effect June 30, 1999." [ 1998 c 67 s 3.]